Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-172
Original packages; labels; seals;
requirements.

No manufacturer or wholesaler shall sell or
deliver any original package containing alcoholic liquor, except beer and
wine, manufactured or distributed by him or her unless the package has affixed
thereto a clear and legible label containing the name and address of the manufacturer,
the kind of alcoholic liquor contained in the package, and, in the case of
alcoholic liquor other than beer, the date when manufactured. No original
package of alcoholic liquor shall be delivered by any manufacturer or wholesaler
unless the package is securely sealed so that the contents cannot be removed
without breaking the seal placed thereon by such manufacturer, and no other
licensee shall sell, have in his or her possession, or use any original package
which does not comply with this section or which does not bear evidence that such original
package, when delivered to him or her, complied with this section.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 31, p. 397;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-331;

R.S.1943, § 53-172;

Laws 1955, c. 201, § 5, p. 575;

Laws 1961, c. 259, § 11, p. 773;

Laws 1963, c. 311, § 6, p. 939;

Laws 1989, LB 780, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 57;

Laws 2010, LB861, § 75.